Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-19] Post-secondary education authorization special subaccount. (a) All moneys collected pursuant to section 305J-18 shall be deposited into the post-secondary education authorization
special subaccount of the compliance resolution fund
established pursuant to section 26-9(o).

(b) Any
law to the contrary notwithstanding, the moneys in the special subaccount
shall be used to fund the operations of the department to carry out
its duties under this chapter.
Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the director may use the moneys in the
special subaccount to employ personnel to carry out the
department's duties under this chapter. The moneys in the special subaccount
may be used to train personnel as the director deems necessary and for any
other activity related to this chapter. [L 2013, c
180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next